Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4048.
People of the State of Michigan enact: CHAPTER XVII Sec. 17b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 752 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 752.272a(4)(c) Pub saf F Sale or distribution of nitrous oxide device  2 or more prior convictions 4 752.365(3) Pub ord G Obscenity  subsequent offense 2 752.388(3) Person F Dissemination of intimate deep fake with aggravating factors 3 752.541 Pub saf D Riot 10 752.542 Pub saf D Incitement to riot 10 752.542a Pub saf D Riot in state correctional facilities 10 752.543 Pub saf G Unlawful assembly 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4047 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor